Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-575
Sewerage and drainage; failure of property owner to connect; notice; cost; special assessment; collection.

If any property owner neglects or fails within a period of ten days after notice has been given to him or her by certified or registered mail or by publication in a legal newspaper published in or of general circulation in a city of the second class or village to make connection with the sewerage system as provided in section 17-574, the governing body of such city or village may cause the connection to be done, assess the cost of such connection against the property as a special assessment, and collect the special assessment in the manner provided for collection of other special assessments.

Laws 1949, c. 22, § 1(2), p. 94;

Laws 1987, LB 93, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 28;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 17-1479.01;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 311.
August 24, 2017